West Virginia, session 2026, HB5564.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14. CIVIL SERVICE FOR DEPUTY SHERIFFS. §7-14-17a. Vacations for deputy sheriffs. The county commission of each county shall allow the sheriff's deputies in its employ, vacation time accrued in the following manner: For deputies with less than five years of service, vacation time shall be accrued at the rate of one and one-quarter days for each calendar month of service; for deputies with five to ten years of service, vacation time shall be accrued at the rate of one and one-half days for each calendar month of service; for deputies with ten to fifteen years of service, vacation time shall be accrued at the rate of one and three-quarter days for each calendar month of service; for deputies with fifteen or more years of service, vacation time shall be accrued at the rate of two days for each calendar month of service.Each deputy sheriff shall only receive vacation time for each month in which he or she shall have worked one hour more than one half the normal working hours in a given month as prescribed by the sheriff.The county commission of each county shall allow each deputy sheriff to carry forward from one calendar year to the next a minimum of 45 days, and in its discretion, up to 60 days, of accrued vacation time. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home